Utah statutes.
20A-1-510.   Midterm vacancies in municipal offices.
(1) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), if any vacancy occurs
in the office of municipal executive or member of a municipal legislative
body, the municipal legislative body shall appoint a registered voter in the
municipality who meets the qualifications for office established in Section
10-3-301 to fill the unexpired term of the office vacated until the January
following the next municipal election.
(b)  Before acting to fill the vacancy, the municipal legislative body shall:
(i)  give public notice of the vacancy at least two weeks before the municipal
legislative body meets to fill the vacancy; and
(ii)  identify, in the notice:
(A)  the date, time, and place of the meeting where the vacancy will be
filled; and
(B)  the person to whom a person interested in being appointed to fill the
vacancy may submit his name for consideration and any deadline for submitting
it.
(c) (i)  If, for any reason, the municipal legislative body does not fill the
vacancy within 30 days after the vacancy occurs, the municipal legislative
body shall vote upon the names that have been submitted.
(ii)  The two persons having the highest number of votes of the municipal
legislative body shall appear before the municipal legislative body and the
municipal legislative body shall vote again.
(iii)  If neither candidate receives a majority vote of the municipal
legislative body at that time, the vacancy shall be filled by lot in the
presence of the municipal legislative body.
(2) (a)  A vacancy in the office of municipal executive or member of a
municipal legislative body shall be filled by an interim appointment, followed
by an election to fill a two-year term, if:
(i)  the vacancy occurs, or a letter of resignation is received, by the
municipal executive at least 14 days before the deadline for filing for
election in an odd-numbered year; and
(ii)  two years of the vacated term will remain after the first Monday of
January following the next municipal election.
(b)  In appointing an interim replacement, the municipal legislative body
shall comply with the notice requirements of this section.
(3)  A member of a municipal legislative body may not participate in any part
of the process established in this section to fill a vacancy if that member is
being considered for appointment to fill the vacancy.
(4) (a)  In a municipality operating under the council-mayor form of
government, as defined in Section 10-3b-102:
(i)  the council may appoint a person to fill a vacancy in the office of mayor
before the effective date of the mayor's resignation by making the effective
date of the appointment the same as the effective date of the mayor's
resignation; and
(ii)  if a vacancy in the office of mayor occurs before the effective date of
an appointment under Subsection (1) or (2) to fill the vacancy, the council
chair shall serve as acting mayor during the time between the creation of the
vacancy and the effective date of the appointment to fill the vacancy.
(b)  While serving as acting mayor under Subsection (4)(a)(ii), the council
chair continues to:
(i)  act as a council member; and
(ii)  vote at council meetings.
